Maryland, session 2026, HB1612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–17.
(d) A sports wagering licensee or sports wagering operator that advertises in the
State [may] SHALL contract with an independent evaluator licensed under subsection (b)
of this section to evaluate and rate the sports wagering licensee’s sports wagering content,
sports wagering experts, sports wagering influencers, and content partners.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is contingent on the
State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission issuing licenses as required under §
9–1E–17 of the State Government Article to at least three independent evaluators.
Article – Election Law
[13–237.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Own” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of the State Government
Article.
(3) “Video lottery facility” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of the State
Government Article.
(4) “Video lottery operation license” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01
of the State Government Article.
(b) This section applies to the following persons:
(1) an applicant for a video lottery operation license;
(2) a holder of a video lottery operation license; or
(3) a person who owns an interest in the operation of a video lottery facility
in this State.
(c) This section does not apply to gaming activity that an eligible organization is
authorized to conduct under the Criminal Law Article.
(d) A person subject to this section may not, directly or indirectly, make a
contribution to:

HOUSE BILL 1612 3
(1) the campaign finance entity of a candidate for any nonfederal public
office in the State; or
(2) any other campaign finance entity organized in support of a candidate
for any nonfederal public office in the State.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2027,
the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency shall study and report to the Governor and
the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
(1) the number of independent evaluators licensed by the State Lottery and
Gaming Control Commission under § 9–1E–17 of the State Government Article;
(2) the utilization of independent evaluators by sports wagering licensees
and sports wagering operators in the State to evaluate sports wagering content in
accordance with § 9–1E–17 of the State Government Article;
(3) the utilization of independent evaluators by sports wagering licensees
and sports wagering operators in other states to evaluate sports wagering content; and
(4) whether any other states require sports wagering licensees or sports
wagering operators licensed in those states to contract with independent evaluators to
evaluate sports wagering content.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
take effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 except
as provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.